Utah statutes.
72-7-506.   Advertising -- Regulatory power of department -- Notice
requirements.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department may make rules no more restrictive than this chapter to:
(a)  control the erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising along the
interstate and primary highway systems;
(b)  provide for enforcement of this chapter;
(c)  establish the form, content, and submittal of applications to erect
outdoor advertising; and
(d)  establish administrative procedures.
(2)  In addition to all other statutory notice requirements:
(a)  the department shall give reasonably timely written notice to all outdoor
advertising permit holders of any changes or proposed changes in
administrative rules made under authority of this part; and
(b)  any county, municipality, or governmental entity shall, upon written
request, give reasonably timely written notice to all outdoor advertising
permit holders within its jurisdiction of any change or proposed change to the
outdoor or off-premise advertising provisions of its zoning provisions, codes,
or ordinances.
